Utah statutes.
34-28-1.   Public and certain other employments excepted.
None of the provisions of this chapter shall apply to the state, or to any
county, incorporated city or town, or other political subdivision, or to
employers and employees engaged in farm, dairy, agricultural, viticultural or
horticultural pursuits or to stock or poultry raising, or to household
domestic service, or to any other employment where an agreement exists between
employer and employee providing for different terms of payment, except the
provisions of Section 34-28-5 shall apply to employers or employees engaged in
farm, dairy, agricultural, viticultural, horticultural or stock or poultry
raising.
